West Virginia, session 2026, HB4504.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-39. Rules for hunting antlered deer. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the director shall propose rules for legislative approval, in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, governing the hunting of antlered deer. The rules shall provide that: (1) The first antlered deer may be harvested by a licensee by any method under existing rules; (2) The second antlered deer harvested by a licensee, regardless of how harvested, shall have three scorable points on one side; and (3) No antlered deer may be harvested by a licensee after harvesting the first two.